Hawaii statutes.
§440G-13 Cable advisory committee. [Repeal
and reenactment on June 30, 2014, by L 2011, c 19, §4 deleted by L 2014, c 93,
§4.] (a) There is established the cable advisory committee. The
committee shall consist of five members appointed by the governor as provided
in section 26-34.

The committee shall advise:

(1) The director, cable operators, and access
organizations on matters within the jurisdiction of this chapter at the request
of the director, any cable operator, or any access organization; and

(2) The director on any decision designating,
modifying, or rescinding a designation of an access organization or the
requirements therefor, as provided in section 440G-8.3.

(b) The members of the committee shall serve
without pay but shall be entitled to reimbursement for necessary expenses while
attending meetings and while in discharge of their duties. [L 1970, c 112, pt
of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 301, §15; am L 2011, c 19, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next